Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 7
INSPECTION OF BOOKS AND RECORDS

44-3-701. Inspection procedures.

Each licensee shall keep a complete set of books of account, invoices, copies of orders, shipping instructions, bills of lading, weigh bills, correspondence, and all other records necessary to show fully the business transactions of such licensee, all of which shall be open at all times during business hours for the inspection and examination of the state licensing authority or its duly authorized representatives. The state licensing authority may require any licensee to furnish such information as it considers necessary for the proper administration of this article 3, and may require an audit to be made of the books of account and records on any occasions as it may consider necessary by an auditor to be selected by the state licensing authority, who shall likewise have access to all books and records of the licensee, and the expense thereof shall be paid by the licensee.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1047, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-701 as it existed prior to 2018.